Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF304.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 139A.35, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 139A.35 Minors. A With the exception of the provision of a vaccination for a sexually transmitted disease or infection, a minor shall have the legal capacity to act and give consent to the provision of medical care or services to the minor for the prevention, diagnosis, or treatment of a sexually transmitted disease or infection by a hospital, clinic, or health care provider. Such medical care or services shall be provided by or under the supervision of a physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery, a physician assistant, or an advanced registered nurse practitioner. Consent shall not be subject to later disaffirmance by reason Senate File 304, p. 2 of such minority. The consent of another person, including but not limited to the consent of a spouse, parent, custodian, or guardian, shall not be necessary. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 304, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor